Virginia statutes. Title 37.2. Behavioral Health and Developmental Services.
Chapter 9. Civil Commitment of Sexually Violent Predators.
§ 37.2-913.
Emergency custody of conditionally released respondents; revocation of conditional release.

A judicial officer may issue an emergency custody order, upon the sworn petition of any responsible person or upon his own motion, based upon probable cause to believe that a respondent on conditional release within his judicial district has violated the conditions of his release and is no longer a proper subject for conditional release. The judicial officer shall forward a copy of the petition and the emergency custody order to the circuit court that conditionally released the respondent, the Attorney General, the Department, and the attorney for the Commonwealth for the locality that is the location of the respondent’s residence. Petitions and orders for emergency custody of conditionally released respondents pursuant to this section may be filed, issued, served, or executed by electronic means, with or without the use of two-way electronic video and audio communication, and returned in the same manner with the same force, effect, and authority as an original document. All signatures thereon shall be treated as original signatures.

The emergency custody order shall require a law-enforcement officer to take the respondent into custody immediately. A law-enforcement officer may lawfully go to or be sent beyond the territorial limits of the county, city, or town in which he serves to any point in the Commonwealth for the purpose of executing an emergency custody order pursuant to this section. The respondent shall be transported to a secure facility specified by the Department where a person designated by the Department who is skilled in the diagnosis and risk assessment of sex offenders and knowledgeable about the treatment of sex offenders shall, as soon as practicable, perform a mental health examination of the respondent, including a personal interview. The mental health evaluator shall consider the criteria in §

37.2-912

and shall opine whether the respondent remains suitable for conditional release. The evaluator shall report his findings and conclusions in writing to the Department, the Office of the Attorney General, counsel for the respondent, and the court in which the petition was filed. The evaluator’s report shall become part of the record in the case.

The respondent on conditional release shall remain in custody until a hearing is held in the circuit court that conditionally released the respondent on the motion or petition to determine if he should be returned to the custody of the Commissioner. The hearing shall be given priority on the court’s docket.

The respondent’s failure to comply with the conditions of release, including outpatient treatment, may be admitted into evidence. The evaluator designated in subsection B may be permitted to testify at the hearing as to his diagnosis, his opinion as to whether the respondent remains suitable for conditional release, his recommendation as to treatment and supervision, and the basis for his opinions. If upon hearing the evidence, the court finds that the respondent on conditional release has violated the conditions of his release and that the violation of conditions was sufficient to render him no longer suitable for conditional release, the court shall revoke his conditional release and order him returned to the custody of the Commissioner for secure inpatient treatment. The respondent may petition the court for re-release pursuant to the conditions set forth in §

37.2-911

no sooner than six months from his return to custody. The respondent petitioning for re-release shall transmit a copy of the petition to the Attorney General, the Commissioner, and the attorney for the Commonwealth for the locality that is the proposed location of the respondent’s residence.

History.

1999, cc. 946, 985, § 37.1-70.14; 2001, c. 776; 2003, cc. 989, 1018; 2005, cc. 51, 716; 2009, c. 740; 2011, c. 42; 2015, c. 662.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2005, c. 51 enacted former § 37.1-67.7.
Pursuant to Acts 2005, c. 716, cl. 5, and § 30-152, Acts 2005, c. 51 has been given effect in this section as set out above. Subsection A of former § 37.1-67.7 has been set out at the end of the first undesignated paragraph.
See also §§

37.2-804.1

and

37.2-1109

.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 740 added subsection A through D designators; in subsection A, substituted “respondent” for “person” and added the present last three sentences; in subsection B, in the first sentence, substituted “respondent” for “person” and deleted “and transport him” from the end, added the present second sentence, in the present third sentence, substituted “the respondent shall be transported to a secure facility” for “to a convenient location,” “by the Department” for “in the order” and “diagnosis, treatment, and risk assessment of sex offenders” for “diagnosis and treatment of mental abnormalities and personality disorders” and deleted “evaluate him for the purpose of determining the nature and degree of violation of the conditions of his release” from the end, deleted the former third and fourth sentences, which read: “A copy of the petition shall be sent to the Attorney General and the Commissioner. Petitions and orders for emergency custody of conditionally released persons pursuant to this section may be filed, issued, served, or executed by electronic means, with or without the use of two-way electronic video and audio communication, and returned in the same manner with the same force, effect, and authority as an original document” and rewrote the last sentence, which formerly read: “All signatures thereon shall be treated as original signatures”; in subsection C, substituted “respondent” for “person” and inserted “that conditionally released the respondent”; and in subsection D, added the present first two sentences, substituted “respondent” for “person” three times, and deleted “original committing” preceding “court for re-release.”

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 42, in the third sentence in subsection B, deleted “treatment” following “diagnosis” and inserted “and knowledgeable about the treatment of sex offenders.”

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 662 inserted “and the attorney for the Commonwealth for the locality that is the location of the respondent’s residence” in subsection A; inserted “and the attorney for the Commonwealth for the locality that is the proposed location of the respondent’s residence” at the end of subsection D.

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 9-517 Emergency Custody Order — Violation of Conditional Release.

§ 37.2-914.
Modification or removal of conditions; notice; objections; review.

The court that placed the person on conditional release may modify conditions of release or remove conditions placed on release pursuant to §

37.2-912

, upon petition of the Department, the supervising parole or probation officer, the Attorney General, or the person on conditional release or upon its own motion based on reports of the Department or the supervising parole or probation officer. However, the person on conditional release may petition only annually commencing six months after the conditional release order is issued. Upon petition, the court shall require the Department or, if the person is on parole or probation, the person’s parole or probation officer to provide a report on the person’s progress while on conditional release. The party petitioning for release shall transmit a copy of the petition to the Attorney General, the Commissioner, and the attorney for the Commonwealth for the locality that is the location of the respondent’s residence.

As it deems appropriate based on the Department’s or parole or probation officer’s report and any other evidence provided to it, the court may issue a proposed order for modification or removal of conditions. The court shall provide notice of the order and their right to object to it within 21 days of its issuance to the person, the Department or parole or probation officer, the Attorney General, and the attorney for the Commonwealth for the locality that is the location of the respondent’s residence. The proposed order shall become final if no objection is filed within 21 days of its issuance. If an objection is so filed, the court shall conduct a hearing at which the person on conditional release, the Attorney General, the Department or the parole or probation officer, and the attorney for the Commonwealth for the locality that is the location of the respondent’s residence shall have an opportunity to present evidence challenging the proposed order. At the conclusion of the hearing, the court shall issue an order specifying conditions of release or removing existing conditions of release.

History.

1999, cc. 946, 985, § 37.1-70.15; 2001, c. 776; 2003, cc. 989, 1018; 2005, c. 716; 2009, c. 740; 2015, c. 662.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 740 substituted “court that placed the person on conditional release” for “committing court” in subsection A.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 662 inserted “and the attorney for the Commonwealth for the locality that is the location of the respondent’s residence” in subsection A and twice in subsection B, and substituted “shall have” for “have” in the fourth sentence in subsection B.

§ 37.2-915.
Representation of Commonwealth and person subject to commitment; nature of proceedings.

The Attorney General shall represent the Commonwealth in all proceedings held pursuant to this chapter. The Attorney General shall receive prior written notice of all proceedings held under this chapter in which he is to represent the Commonwealth.

The court shall appoint counsel for the person subject to commitment or conditional release pursuant to subsection C of §

37.2-906

unless the person waives his right to counsel. The court shall consider appointment of the person who represented the person in previous proceedings.

All proceedings held under this chapter shall be civil proceedings.

History.

1999, cc. 946, 985, § 37.1-70.16; 2001, c. 776; 2003, cc. 989, 1018; 2005, c. 716; 2012, cc. 121, 246.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 121 and 246 are identical, and substituted “subsection C” for “subsection B” in the second paragraph.

§ 37.2-916.
Authority of Commissioner; delegation to board; liability.

For the purposes of carrying out the duties of this chapter, the Commissioner may appoint an advisory board composed of persons with demonstrated expertise in such matters. The Department shall assist the board in its administrative and technical duties. The membership of the board shall include (i) a citizen appointed by the Commissioner, (ii) a psychiatrist or psychologist licensed to practice in the Commonwealth who is skilled in the diagnosis of mental abnormalities and personality disorders associated with violent sex offenders and who is a full-time employee of the Department of Corrections, to be appointed by its director, (iii) a member of the Department of State Police, and (iv) such other members as deemed appropriate by the Commissioner. Members of the board shall exercise their powers and duties without compensation, except that members of the board who are not state employees shall be reimbursed by the Department for their approved travel expenses to the meetings of this board at the approved state rate. Members of the board shall be immune from personal liability while acting within the scope of their duties except for intentional misconduct.

History.

1999, cc. 946, 985, § 37.1-70.17; 2001, c. 776; 2005, c. 716.

§ 37.2-917.
Escape of persons committed; penalty.

Any person committed to the custody of the Commissioner pursuant to this chapter who escapes from custody shall be guilty of a Class 6 felony.

History.

1999, cc. 946, 985, § 37.1-70.18; 2001, c. 776; 2005, c. 716.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 6 felony, see §

18.2-10

.

§ 37.2-918.
Persons on conditional release leaving Commonwealth; penalty.

Any person placed on conditional release pursuant to this chapter who leaves the Commonwealth without permission from the court that conditionally released the person or fails to return to the Commonwealth in violation of a court order shall be guilty of a Class 6 felony.

History.

1999, cc. 946, 985, § 37.1-70.19; 2001, c. 776; 2005, c. 716; 2009, c. 740.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 6 felony, see §

18.2-10

.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 740 inserted “or fails to return to the Commonwealth in violation of a court order.”

§ 37.2-919.
Postrelease supervision of Department; commission of new criminal offense by person committed to Department.

If a person committed to the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services, whether in involuntary secure inpatient treatment or on conditional release, who is also on probation, parole, or postrelease supervision, fails to comply with any conditions established by the Department, or fails to comply with the terms of a treatment plan, the Department shall so notify the Department of Corrections or the person’s probation and parole officer.

If a person committed to the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services is arrested for a felony or Class 1 or 2 misdemeanor offense, he shall be transported to a judicial officer forthwith for a bond determination in accordance with the provisions of §

19.2-80

. If the judicial officer admits the accused to bail, he shall, upon his admission to bail, be immediately transported back into the custody of the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services. If, after trial for this offense, no active period of incarceration is imposed, or if the person is acquitted or the charges are withdrawn or dismissed, he shall be returned to the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services pursuant to his commitment. If a period of active incarceration of 12 months or longer is imposed or any suspended sentence is revoked resulting in the person being returned to the Department of Corrections for a period of active incarceration of 12 months or longer, the person shall not be entitled to an annual or biennial review hearing pursuant to §

37.2-910

until 12 months after he has been returned to the custody of the Commissioner. Such reincarceration shall toll the provisions of §

37.2-910

.

History.

2005, cc. 716, 914; 2006, cc. 863, 914; 2009, cc. 813, 840.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 1 and Class 2 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2005, c. 914, effective April 6, 2005, enacted former § 37.1-70.20.
Pursuant to § 30-152 and Acts 2005, c. 716, cl. 5, the 2005 enactment by c. 914 has been given effect as this section.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendments by cc. 863 and 914 are identical, and added subsection A; inserted the subsection B designator at the beginning of the former first paragraph; and added the last two sentences in subsection B.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendments by cc. 813 and 840 are identical, and substituted “Behavioral Health and Developmental” for “Mental Health, Mental Retardation and Substance Abuse” throughout the section.

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

Authority to recommit without annual review hearing. —

Circuit court had authority to recommit respondent to the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services (DBHDS) upon his release from the Federal Bureau of Prisons without affording him an annual review hearing because he was serving a period of active incarceration of twelve months or longer, and thus, his review hearing was tolled until twelve months after he has been returned to the DBHDS; the plain meaning of the statute is unambiguous and would not lead to an absurd result. Commonwealth v. Johnson, 98 Va. Cir. 74, 2018 Va. Cir. LEXIS 6 (Fairfax County Jan. 10, 2018).

Committment pursuant to subsection B. —

For the purposes of subsection B, respondent was committed into the custody of the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services (DBHDS) because the order of trial and commitment stated that he “is committed”; despite that respondent had never been admitted to DBHDS’s treatment facility and had not participated in any treatment, he was still committed into the custody of DBHDS. Commonwealth v. Johnson, 98 Va. Cir. 74, 2018 Va. Cir. LEXIS 6 (Fairfax County Jan. 10, 2018).

Due process rights not violated. —

Respondent’s due process rights were not violated when he was recommitted to the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services without an annual review hearing because respondent would not be indefinitely committed without a review hearing and was entitled to a review hearing twelve months after he completes his active sentence with the United States Bureau of Prisons. Commonwealth v. Johnson, 98 Va. Cir. 74, 2018 Va. Cir. LEXIS 6 (Fairfax County Jan. 10, 2018).

§ 37.2-920.
Appeal by Attorney General; emergency custody order.

In any case in which the Attorney General successfully appeals the trial court’s denial of probable cause, denial of civil commitment or conditional release, or discharge or placement on conditional release after an annual review hearing, upon the issuance of the mandate by the Court of Appeals, the trial court shall immediately issue an emergency custody order to any local law-enforcement official to have the person taken into custody and held in the local correctional facility, pending further appropriate proceedings.

History.

2006, cc. 863, 914; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 489.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 489, cl. 3 provides: “That any case for which a notice of appeal to the Supreme Court has been filed prior to January 1, 2022, shall continue in the Supreme Court of Virginia and shall not be affected by the provisions of this act.”

Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 489, cl. 4 provides: “That any case for which a petition for appeal in a criminal case to the Court of Appeals has been filed prior to January 1, 2022, and a decision on such petition remains pending, such petition for appeal shall be deemed granted and the clerk of the Court of Appeals shall certify the granting of such petition to the trial court and all counsel. Such case shall be considered mature for purposes of further proceedings from the date of such certificate.”

Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 489, cl. 6 provides: “That the provisions of this act amending
§

17.1-400

of the Code of Virginia shall become effective in due course and that the remaining provisions of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2022.”

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 489, effective January 1, 2022, substituted “Court of Appeals” for “Supreme Court of Virginia.”

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 9-2034 Emergency Custody Order Pursuant to Va. Code Ann. §

37.2-920

.

§ 37.2-921.
Department to give notice of Sex Offender and Crimes Against Minors Registry requirements to certain persons.

Prior to the release or discharge of any committed respondent for whom registration with the Sex Offender and Crimes Against Minors Registry is required pursuant to Chapter 9 (§

9.1-900

et seq.) of Title 9.1, the Department shall give notice to the committed respondent of his duty to register with the State Police. A person required to register shall register, submit to be photographed as part of the registration, and provide information regarding place of employment, if available, to the Department. The Department shall also obtain from that person all necessary registration information, including fingerprints and photographs of a type and kind approved by the Department of State Police, inform the person of his duties regarding reregistration and change of address, and inform the person of his duty to register. The Department shall forward the registration information to the Department of State Police on the date of the committed respondent’s release or discharge.

Whenever a person required to register has failed to comply with the provisions of subsection A, the Department shall promptly investigate or request the State Police promptly investigate and, if there is probable cause to believe a violation has occurred, obtain a warrant or assist in obtaining an indictment charging a violation of §

18.2-472.1

in the jurisdiction in which the person was released or discharged. The Department shall notify the State Police forthwith of such actions taken pursuant to this section.

The Department shall notify the State Police immediately upon discovering the escape of any committed respondent for whom registration with the Sex Offender and Crimes Against Minors Registry is required pursuant to Chapter 9 (§

9.1-900

et seq.) of Title 9.1.

History.

2010, c. 858.